Chapter 15 Secession and the Civil War


The Emergence of Lincoln
 The man elected to the White House in 1860 was striking in appearance—he was 6 feet, 4 inches, but seemed even taller because of his disproportionately long legs and his habit of wearing a high silk “stovepipe” hat. But Abraham Lincoln’s previous career provided no guarantee he would tower over most of the other presidents in his legacy. When Lincoln sketched the main events of his life for a campaign biographer in June 1860, he was modest almost to the point of self-deprecation. Especially regretting his “want of education,” he assured the biographer that “he does what he can to supply the want.” Born to poor, illiterate parents on the Kentucky frontier in 1809, Lincoln received a few months of formal schooling in Indiana after the family moved there in 1816. But mostly he educated himself, reading and rereading a few treasured books by firelight. In 1831, when the family migrated to Illinois, he left home to make a living for himself in the struggling settlement of New Salem, where he worked as a surveyor, shopkeeper, and local postmaster. His brief career as a merchant was disastrous: He went bankrupt and was saddled with debt for years to come. But he eventually found a path to success in law and politics. While studying law on his own in New Salem, he managed to get elected to the state legislature. In 1837, he moved to Springfield, a growing town that offered bright prospects for a young lawyer-politician. Lincoln combined exceptional political and legal skills with a

 down-to-earth, humorous way of addressing jurors and voters. Consequently, he became a leader of the Whig party in Illinois and one of the most sought after lawyers riding the central Illinois judicial circuit. The high point of his political career as a Whig was one term in Congress (1847–1849). Lincoln would have faced certain defeat had he sought reelection. His strong stance against the Mexican-American War alienated much of his constituency, and the voters expressed their disaffection in 1848 by electing a Democrat over the Whig who tried to succeed Lincoln. In 1849, President Zachary Taylor, for whom Lincoln had campaigned vigorously and effectively, failed to appoint him to a patronage job he coveted. Having been repudiated by the electorate and ignored by the national leadership of a party he had served loyally and well, Lincoln concentrated on building his law practice. The Kansas–Nebraska Act of 1854, with its advocacy of popular sovereignty, provided Lincoln with a heaven-sent opportunity to return to politics with a stronger base of support. For the first time, his driving ambition for political success and his personal convictions about what was best for the country were easy to reconcile. Lincoln had long believed slavery was an unjust institution that should be tolerated only to the extent the Constitution and the tradition of sectional compromise required. He attacked Douglas’s plan of popular sovereignty because it broke with precedents for

 On February 27, 1860, Abraham Lincoln gave his famous “Right Makes Might” speech at Cooper Union. That same day, he went over to famed photographer Mathew Brady’s studio at Broadway and Bleecker Street where he sat for an official campaign portrait. Lincoln would later credit the speech and the photo with making him president.



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 federal containment or control of the growth of slavery. After trying in vain to rally Free-Soilers around the Whig standard, Lincoln threw his lot in with the Republicans, assumed leadership of the new party in Illinois, attracted national attention in his bid for Douglas’s Senate seat in 1858, and was the Republican presidential nominee in 1860. After Lincoln’s election provoked southern secession and plunged the nation into the greatest crisis in its history, there was understandable skepticism about him in many quarters: Was the former rail-splitter from Illinois up to the responsibilities he faced? Lincoln had less experience relevant to a wartime presidency than any previous or future chief executive; he had never been a governor, senator, cabinet officer, vice president, or high-ranking military officer. But some of his training as a prairie politician would prove extremely useful. Lincoln was also effective because he identified wholeheartedly with the northern cause and could inspire others to make sacrifices for it. To him, the issue in the conflict was nothing less than the survival of the kind of political system that gave men like himself a chance for high office. In addressing a special session of Congress in 1861, Lincoln provided a powerful statement of what the war was all about: And this issue embraces more than the fate of these United States. It presents to the whole family of man, the question of whether a constitutional republic, or a democracy—a government of the people by the same people—can, or cannot, maintain its territorial integrity against its own domestic foes. he Civil War put on trial the very principle of democracy at a time when most European nations had rejected political liberalism and accepted the conservative view that popular government would inevitably collapse into anarchy. It also showed the shortcomings of a purely white man’s democracy and brought the first hesitant steps toward black citizenship. As Lincoln put it in the Gettysburg Address, the only cause great enough to justify the enormous sacrifice of life on the battlefields was the struggle to preserve and extend the democratic ideal, or to ensure that “government of the people, by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the Earth.”

 As he prepared to take office in 1861, Lincoln could scarcely anticipate the challenges he would face. The immediate problem was how to respond to the secession of the Deep South. But secession was just an expression of the larger question: Did the authority of the federal government outweigh the power of the individual states? No less important were questions about slavery: Was it morally acceptable for one person to “own” another? Could the Union continue to exist half-slave and half-free? The sectionalism that had already led to a number of violent incidents—bloody fighting in Kansas, the assault on Charles Sumner, John Brown’s raid on Harpers Ferry, his conviction on charges of treason against Virginia, and his eventual execution— continued to mount. Finally, irreconcilable differences erupted into “total war” that left no part of society—North or South—untouched.

The Storm Gathers
 What developments and events drew the Union toward Civil War? Lincoln’s election provoked the secession of seven states of the Deep South but did not lead immediately to armed conflict. Before the sectional quarrel would turn from a cold war into a hot one, two things had to happen: A final effort to defuse the conflict by compromise and conciliation had to fail, and the North needed to develop a firm resolve to maintain the Union by military action. Both of these developments may seem inevitable in

Watch the Video


What Caused the Civil War?


T


 There really should not be a great debate over what caused the Civil War. Imagine if you will an America before the Civil War without slavery.

The Storm Gathers


 retrospect, but for most of those living at the time, it was not clear until the guns blazed at Fort Sumter that the sectional crisis would have to be resolved on the battlefield.

The Deep South Secedes
 South Carolina, which had long been in the forefront of southern rights and proslavery agitation, was the first state to secede. On December 20, 1860, a convention meeting in Charleston declared unanimously that “the union now subsisting between South Carolina and other states, under the name of the ‘United States of America,’

Read the Document


South Carolina Declaration
 of the Causes of Secession

A
South Carolina newspaper announces the dissolution of the Union. South Carolina’s secession was celebrated in the South with bonfires, parades, and fireworks. 


 is hereby dissolved.” The constitutional theory behind secession was that the Union was a “compact” among sovereign states, each of which could withdraw from the Union by the vote of a convention similar to the one that had initially ratified the Constitution. The South Carolinians justified seceding at that time by charging that “a sectional party” had elected a president “whose opinions and purposes are hostile to slavery.” In other states of the Cotton Kingdom, there was similar outrage at Lincoln’s election but less certainty about how to respond to it. Those who advocated immediate secession by each state individually were opposed by the cooperationists, who believed the slave states should act as a unit. If the cooperationists had triumphed, secession would have been delayed until a southern convention had agreed on it. Some of these moderates hoped a delay would provide time to extort major concessions from the North, removing the need for secession. But South Carolina’s unilateral action set a precedent that weakened the cooperationists’ cause. Elections for delegates to secession conventions in six other Deep South states were hotly contested. Cooperationists did especially well in Georgia, Louisiana, and Texas. But nowhere did they stop secessionists from winning a majority. By February 1, seven states had removed themselves from the Union—South Carolina, Alabama, Mississippi, Florida, Georgia, Louisiana, and Texas. In the upper South, however, a moderate Unionist element, deriving mainly from the old Whig party, had maintained its strength and cohesion. Economic diversification had increased the importance of free labor and ties to the northern economy. Consequently, leaders in the border slave states were more willing than those in the lower South to seek a sectional compromise. Without waiting for their sister slave states to the north, delegates from the Deep South met in Montgomery, Alabama, on February 4 to establish the Confederate States of America. The convention acted as a provisional government while at the same time drafting a permanent constitution. Relatively moderate leaders dominated the proceedings and defeated or modified some of the pet schemes of a radical faction composed of extreme southern nationalists. The resulting constitution was surprisingly similar to that of the United States. Most of the differences merely spelled out traditional southern interpretations of the federal charter: The central government was denied the authority to impose protective tariffs, subsidize internal improvements, or interfere with slavery in the states and was required to pass laws protecting slavery in the territories. As provisional president and vice president, the convention chose Jefferson Davis of Mississippi and Alexander Stephens of Georgia, men who had resisted secessionist agitation. Stephens, in fact, had led the cooperationist forces in his home state. Radical “fire eaters” such as William Yancey of Alabama and Robert Barnwell Rhett of South Carolina were denied positions of authority. The moderation shown in Montgomery resulted in part from a desire to win support for the cause of secessionism in the reluctant states of the upper South, where such radical measures as reopening the slave trade were unpopular. But it also revealed something important about the nature of the separatist impulse. Proslavery reactionaries, who were totally lacking in reverence for the Union and wanted to found an aristocratic nation very different from the democratic United States, had never succeeded in getting a majority behind them. Most Southerners opposed dissolving the Union for so long as slavery was safe from northern interference.



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

View the Map


WASH IN

Secession


BRITISH NORTH AMERICA (CANADA)
Gr ea 
G


 s

.
 TERR

 MASS.

N.Y.


 WIS.

R.I.
 CONN.

MICH. NEBRASKA TERRITORY

NEVADA TERR.

VT. N.H.

 ke

N
 TO

 OREGON

 MINN.

DAKOTA TERRITORY

 MAINE

 t L a

UTAH TERRITORY

 PA.

IOWA IND.

ILL. COLORADO TERRITORY

 CALIF.

 KANSAS

OHIO W.VA.

N.J.
 MD.

(Statehood D.C.
1863)


 DEL.

 VA.

 MO.

KY. N.C.

NEW MEXICO TERRITORY

 TENN.

INDIAN TERRITORY ARK. (UNORGANIZED)

S.C.
 ALA.

MISS. TEXAS

 GA.

Ft.
Sumter


LA. FLA.

PACIFIC OCEAN



 Slave states seceding before the fall of Ft. Sumter, April 1861 Slave states seceding after the fall of Ft. Sumter, April 1861 Slave states loyal to the Union

Gulf of Mexico


 MEXICO

ATLANTIC OCEAN

 500 miles

 500 kilometers

 Free states Free territories

SECESSION
The fall of Fort Sumter was a watershed for the secessionist movement. With no room left for compromise, slave states of the upper South chose to join the Confederacy. The Montgomery convention did not try to establish a slaveholder’s reactionary utopia but just aimed to re-create the Union as it had been before the rise of the new Republican party. The decision to allow free states to join the Confederacy reflected a hope that much of the old Union could be reconstituted under southern direction. Some optimists even predicted that all of the North except New England would eventually transfer its loyalty to the new government. Secession and the formation of the Confederacy thus amounted to a very conservative and defensive kind of “revolution.” The only justification for southern independence on which a majority could agree was the need for greater security for the “peculiar institution.” Vice President Stephens spoke for all the founders of the Confederacy when he described the cornerstone of the new government as “the great truth that the negro is not equal to the white man—that slavery—subordination to the superior race—is his natural condition.” 
The Failure of Compromise
 While the Deep South was opting for independence, moderates in the North and border slave states were trying to devise a compromise that would stem the secessionist tide before it could engulf the entire South. When the lame-duck Congress reconvened in December 1860, strong sentiment existed, even among some Republicans, to seek an adjustment of sectional differences. Senator John Crittenden of Kentucky presented a plan that served as the focus for discussion. The proposed

 Crittenden Compromise, which resembled Henry Clay’s ear-

 lier compromises, advocated extending the Missouri Compromise line to the Pacific to guarantee the protection of slavery in the southwestern territories and in any territories south of the line that might later be acquired. It also recommended federal compensation to the owners of escaped slaves and a constitutional amendment that would forever prohibit the federal government from abolishing or regulating slavery. Initially, congressional Republicans showed some willingness to take the proposals seriously. At one point, William Seward of New York, the leading Republican in the Senate, leaned toward supporting a version of the Crittenden plan. Republicans in Congress turned for guidance to the president-elect, who had remained in Springfield and was refusing to make public statements on the secession crisis. An emissary brought back word that Lincoln was adamantly opposed to the compromise. Congressional Republicans therefore voted against compromise, as did the remaining senators and congressmen of the seceding states, who had vowed in advance to support no compromise unless the majority of Republicans also endorsed it. Their purpose in taking this stand was to obtain guarantees that the northern sectional party would end its attacks on “southern rights.” The Republicans did in the end agree to support Crittenden’s “un-amendable” amendment guaranteeing that slavery would be immune from future federal action. This action was not really a concession to the South, because Republicans had always acknowledged that the federal government had no constitutional authority to meddle with slavery in the states.

The Storm Gathers


 Some historians have blamed Lincoln and the Republicans for causing an unnecessary war by rejecting a compromise that would have appeased southern pride without providing any immediate practical opportunities for the expansion of slavery. But it is questionable whether approval of the compromise would have halted secession of the Deep South. The Republicans also believed that extending the Missouri Compromise line of 36°30´ to the Pacific would not halt agitation for extending slavery to new areas such as Cuba and Central America. The only way to resolve the crisis over the future of slavery and to reunite “the house divided” was to remove any chance that slaveholders could enlarge their domain. Lincoln was also convinced that backing down in the face of secessionist threats would fatally undermine the democratic principle of majority rule. In his inaugural address of March 4, 1861, he recalled that during the winter, many “patriotic men” had urged him to accept a compromise that would “shift the ground” on which he had been elected. But to do so would have signified that a victorious presidential candidate “cannot be inaugurated till he betrays those who elected him by breaking his pledges, and surrendering to those who tried and failed to defeat him at the polls.” Making such a concession would mean that “this government and all popular government is already at an end.”

And the War Came
 By the time of Lincoln’s inauguration, seven states had seceded, formed an independent confederacy, and seized most federal forts and other installations in the Deep South without firing a shot.



 Some Northerners thought it would be best to let the Confederate states “depart in peace,” whether because they wanted to maintain commercial links with the cotton-producing South, or because they opposed a bloody war. The collapse of compromise efforts narrowed the choices to peaceful separation or war between the sections. By early March, the tide of public opinion, even in the business community, was beginning to shift in favor of coercive measures to preserve the Union. In his inaugural address, Lincoln called for a cautious and limited use of force. He would defend federal forts and installations not yet in Confederate hands but would not attempt to recapture the ones already taken. He thus tried to shift the burden for beginning hostilities to the Confederacy, which would have to attack before it would be attacked. As Lincoln spoke, only four military installations within the seceded states were still held by U.S. forces. One of these was Fort Sumter in Charleston Harbor, which was under pressure from the Confederacy, and running low on food. Against the advice of some of his cabinet, Lincoln decided to send a ship to resupply the fort. Before the expedition arrived, the Confederate army attacked the fort. After two days of heavy bombardment, the Union forces surrendered, and the Confederate flag was raised over Fort Sumter. The South had won a victory, without a single death on either side. On April 15, Lincoln proclaimed that an insurrection against federal authority existed in the Deep South and called on the militia of the loyal states to provide seventy-five thousand troops for short-term service to put it down. Two days later, a sitting Virginia convention, which had earlier rejected secession, reversed itself

 This contemporary Currier and Ives lithograph depicts the bombardment of Fort Sumter on April 12–13, 1861. The soldiers are firing from Fort Moultrie in Charleston Harbor, which the Union garrison had evacuated the previous December in order to strengthen Fort Sumter.



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 and voted to join the Confederacy. Within the next five weeks, Arkansas, Tennessee, and North Carolina followed suit. These slave states of the upper South had been unwilling to secede just because Lincoln was elected, but when he called on them to provide troops to “coerce” other southern states, they had to choose sides. In the North, the firing on Sumter evoked strong feelings of patriotism and dedication to the Union. “It seems as if we were never alive till now; never had a country till now,” wrote a New Yorker; and a Bostonian noted, “I never before knew what a popular excitement can be.” Stephen A. Douglas, Lincoln’s former political rival, pledged his full support for the crusade against secession and literally worked himself to death rallying midwestern Democrats. By firing on the flag, the Confederacy united the North. Everyone assumed the war would be short and not very bloody. It remained to be seen whether Unionist fervor could be sustained through a prolonged struggle. The entire Confederacy, which now moved its capital from Montgomery to Richmond, Virginia, contained only eleven of the fifteen states in which slavery was lawful. In the border slave states of Maryland, Delaware, Kentucky, and Missouri, a combination of local Unionism and federal intervention thwarted secession. Kentucky, the most crucial of these states, greeted the outbreak of war by proclaiming its neutrality. Kentucky eventually sided with the Union, mainly because Lincoln, who was careful to respect this tenuous neutrality, provoked the South into violating it first by sending regular troops into the state. Maryland, which surrounded the nation’s capital and provided it with access to the free states, was kept in the Union by more ruthless methods, which included the use of martial law to suppress Confederate sympathizers. In Missouri, the presence of regular troops, aided significantly by a staunchly pro-Union German immigrant population, stymied the secession movement. But pro-Union forces failed to establish order in this deeply divided frontier state. Brutal guerrilla fighting made wartime Missouri an unsafe and bloody place. Hence the Civil War was not, strictly speaking, a struggle between slave and free states. Nor did it simply pit states that could not tolerate Lincoln’s election against those that could. More than anything else, conflicting views on the right of secession determined the ultimate division of states and the choices of individuals in areas where sentiment was divided. General Robert E. Lee, for example, was neither a defender of slavery nor a southern nationalist. But he followed Virginia out of the Union because he was the loyal son of a “sovereign state.” General George Thomas, another Virginian, chose the Union because he believed it was indissoluble. Although concern about the future of slavery had driven the Deep South to secede in the first place, the actual lineup of states and supporters meant the two sides would initially define the war less as a struggle over slavery than as a contest to determine whether the Union was indivisible.

Adjusting to Total War
 What challenges did “total war” bring for each side? The Civil War was a “total war.” It involved every aspect of society because the North could achieve its aim of restoring the Union only by defeating the South so thoroughly that its separatist government

 would be overthrown. Total war is a test of societies, economies, and political systems, as well as a battle of wits between generals and military strategists—and the Civil War was no exception.

Prospects, Plans, and Expectations
 If the war was to be decided by sheer physical strength, then the North had an enormous edge in population, industrial capacity, and railroad mileage. Nevertheless, the South had some advantages that went a long way toward counterbalancing the North’s demographic and industrial superiority. The South could do more with less because its armies faced an easier task. To achieve its aim of independence, the Confederacy needed only to defend its own territory successfully. The North, on the other hand, had to invade and conquer the South. Consequently, the Confederacy faced a less serious supply problem, had a greater capacity to choose the time and place of combat, and could take advantage of familiar terrain and a sympathetic civilian population. The nature of the war meant southern leaders could define their cause as defense of their homeland against an alien invader and thus appeal to the fervid patriotism of a white population that viewed Yankee domination as a form of slavery. The northern cause, however, was not nearly as clear-cut as that of the South. It seemed doubtful in 1861 that Northerners would be willing to give equally fervent support to a war fought for the seemingly abstract principle that the Union was sacred and perpetual. Confederate optimism on the eve of the war was also fed by other—and more dubious—calculations. It was widely assumed that Southerners would make better fighting men than Yankees. Farm boys accustomed to riding and shooting could allegedly whip several times their number among the clerks and factory workers (many of them immigrants) who, it was anticipated, would make up a large part of the Union army. (Actually, a majority of northern soldiers would also be farm boys.) When most of the large proportion of high-ranking officers in the U.S. Army who were of southern origin resigned to accept Confederate commands, Southerners confidently expected that their armies would be better led. If external help was needed, major foreign powers such as England and France might aid the Confederacy because the industrial economies of those European nations depended on the importation of southern cotton. As they thought about strategy after Fort Sumter, the leaders of both sides tried to find the best way to capitalize on their advantages and compensate for their limitations. Although the Confederates’ primary strategic orientation was defensive, it was an “offensive defense” that southern commanders enacted, acting aggressively against exposed Northern forces within the South. Northern military planners had greater difficulty in working out a basic strategy, and it took a good deal of trial and error before there was a clear sense of what had to be done. Quite early it became evident that the optimistic hope of a quick and easy war was unrealistic. Aware of the costs of invading the South at points where its forces were concentrated, the aged General Winfield Scott—who commanded the Union army during the early months of the war—recommended an anaconda policy. Like a great boa constrictor, the North would squeeze the South

Adjusting to Total War




RESOURCES OF THE UNION AND THE CONFEDERACY, 1861. 1,300,000

 Industrial workers 110,000 110,000 Factories

Union


1,800


Confederacy
Ratio 20:1
 Pig iron

Ratio 17:1


Textiles
 (including cotton cloth and woolen goods)

Value of
 industrial production

$1.5 Billion
$155 Million
 22,000 miles

 Railroad tracks 9,000 miles Ratio 32:1 Firearms

 into submission by blockading the southern coasts, seizing control of the Mississippi, and cutting off supplies of food and other essential commodities. This plan pointed to the West as the main locus of military operations. Eventually Lincoln decided on a two-front war. He would keep the pressure on Virginia in the hope a breakthrough would occur there, while at the same time, he would authorize an advance down the Mississippi Valley with the aim of isolating Texas, Arkansas, and Louisiana. Lincoln also attached great importance to the coastal blockade and expected naval operations to seize the ports through which goods entered and left the Confederacy. His basic plan of applying pressure and probing for weaknesses at several points simultaneously was a good one because it took maximum advantage of the North’s superiority in manpower and matériel. But it required better military leadership than the North possessed at the beginning of the war and took a painfully long time to put into effect.

Mobilizing the Home Fronts
 The North and South faced similar problems in trying to create the vast support systems needed by armies in the field. At the beginning of the conflict, both sides had more volunteers than could be armed and outfitted. The South was forced to reject about two hundred thousand men in the first year of the war, and the North could commit only a fraction of its forces to battle. Further confusion resulted from the fact that recruiting was done primarily by the states, which were reluctant to surrender control of their forces. Both Lincoln and Davis had to deal with governors who resisted centralized military direction. As it became clear that hopes for a short and easy war were false, the pool of volunteers began to dry up. Many of the early recruits, who had been enrolled for short terms, showed a reluctance to reenlist. To resolve this problem, the Confederacy passed

 a conscription law in April 1862, and the Union edged toward a draft in July. (See the Feature Essay, “Soldiering in the Civil War,” pp. 350–351.) To produce the materials of war, both governments relied mainly on private industry. While there was some inefficiency in its private contracting system, the North’s economy was strong at the core, and by 1863 its factories and farms were producing more than enough to provision the troops without significantly lowering the living standards of the civilian population. The southern economy was much less adaptable. Because of the weakness of its industrial base, the South of 1861 depended on the outside world for most of its manufactured goods. As the Union blockade became more effective, the Confederacy had to rely increasingly on a government-sponsored crash program to produce war materials. Astonishingly, the Confederates succeeded in producing or procuring sufficient armaments to keep southern armies well supplied. Southern agriculture, however, failed to meet the challenge. Planters were reluctant to shift from staples that could no longer be readily exported to foodstuffs that were urgently needed. But more significant was the inadequacy of the South’s internal transportation system. New railroad construction during the war did not resolve the problem; most of the new lines were aimed at facilitating the movement of troops rather than the distribution of food. When northern forces penetrated parts of the South, they created new gaps in the system. As a result, much of the corn or livestock that was raised could not reach the people who needed it. Although well armed, Confederate soldiers were increasingly undernourished, and by 1863 civilians in urban areas were rioting to protest shortages of food. To supply the troops, the Confederate commissary resorted to the impressment of available agricultural produce at below the market price, a policy resisted so vigorously by farmers and local politicians that it eventually had to be abandoned.

 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 WIS.

 MICH.

 MO.

IND. ILL.

.


 o Ohi

 PA.

N.J.
Gettysburg
DEL. OHIO MD.
Washington, D.C. DRIVE NORTH To demoralize and PRESSURE ON divert Union forces RICHMOND AND VIRGINIA Richmond VA. 
 IOWA

 iR Mississipp

 Another challenge faced by both sides was how to finance an enormously costly struggle. Although special war taxes were imposed, neither side was willing to resort to the heavy taxation that was needed to maintain fiscal integrity. Besides floating loans and selling bonds, both treasuries deliberately inflated the currency by printing large quantities of paper money that could not be redeemed in gold and silver, known as greenbacks because of their color. The presses rolled throughout the war, and runaway inflation was the inevitable result. The problem was much less severe in the North because of the overall strength of its economy. War taxes on income were more readily collectable than in the South, and bond issues were more successful. In the South, by contrast, the Confederate government fell deeper and deeper into debt and printed more and more paper money, until it could be said with little exaggeration that it took a wheelbarrow full of money to buy a purse full of goods.

R.
 KY.

ADVANCE ALONG THE MISSISSIPPI
To isolate Arkansas, Louisiana, and Texas 
E
NS FE DE E IV
an NS by FE uth se S.C. OF So defen TE the ve Atlanta RA end ssi E e MISS. ED def gr g GA. NF To a O ALA. TENN. 
 ARK.

N.C.


ATLANTIC OCEAN

C




Vicksburg
 LA.

UNION NAVAL BLOCKADE
To restrict shipping 
TEXAS
New Orleans FLA. 
Political Leadership: Northern Success
 and Southern Failure

Gulf of Mexico


 Both the Union and the Confederacy exercised unprecedented government authority during the War. Presidents Lincoln and Davis took actions that would have been regarded as arbitrary or even tyrannical in peacetime. Nevertheless, “politics as usual”— in the form of free elections, public political controversy, and the maneuverings of parties, factions, and interest groups—persisted to a surprising degree. Lincoln was especially bold in assuming new executive powers, even interfering with civil liberties to an extent that may have been unconstitutional. He expanded the regular army and advanced public money to private individuals without authorization by Congress. On April 27, 1861, he declared martial law, which enabled the military to arrest civilians suspected of aiding the enemy, and suspended the writ of habeas corpus in the area between Philadelphia and Washington, an action deemed necessary because of mob attacks on Union troops passing through Baltimore. Suspension of the writ enabled the government to arrest Confederate sympathizers and hold them without trial, and in September 1862 Lincoln extended this authority to all parts of the United States where “disloyal” elements were active. Lincoln argued that “necessity” justified a flexible interpretation of his war powers. For critics of suspension, he had a question: “Are all the laws, but one, to go unexecuted, and the government itself to go to pieces, lest that one be violated?” In fact, however, most of the thousands of civilians arrested by military authorities were not exercising their right to criticize the government but were suspected deserters and draft dodgers, refugees, smugglers, or people who were simply found wandering in areas under military control. For the most part, the Lincoln administration showed restraint and tolerated a broad spectrum of political dissent. Although the government closed down a few newspapers for brief periods when they allegedly published false information or military secrets, antiadministration journals were allowed to criticize the president and his party. A few politicians, including an Ohio Congressman, were arrested for pro-Confederate activity, but a large number of “Peace Democrats”—who called for restoration of the Union by negotiation





 250 miles

 250 kilometers

The Union


The Confederacy


 Border states

OVERVIEW OF CIVIL WAR STRATEGY
Confederate military leaders were convinced the South could not be defended unless they took the initiative to determine where critical battles would be fought. 
 rather than force—ran for office and sat in Congress and in state legislatures, where they were able to present their views to the public. In fact, the persistence of vigorous two-party competition in the North during the Civil War strengthened Lincoln’s hand. Since his war policies were also the platform of his party, he could usually rely on unified partisan backing for the most controversial of his decisions. Lincoln was singularly adept at the art of party leadership, accommodating disagreement and encouraging unity and dedication to the cause. When a majority of the Republican party came around to the view that freeing the slaves was necessary to the war effort, Lincoln found a way to comply with their wishes while minimizing the disenchantment of the conservative minority. Republican cohesiveness was essential to Lincoln’s success in unifying the nation by force. Jefferson Davis, most historians agree, was a less effective war leader than Lincoln. He assumed personal direction of the armed forces but left policy making for the mobilization and control of the civilian population primarily to the Confederate Congress. He stumbled as commander in chief when he passed over able generals in favor of the incompetent but personal favorite Braxton E. Bragg. Davis also ignored the problems of the homefront, especially the deteriorating economic situation that was sapping Confederate morale. Although the South had a much more serious problem of

Adjusting to Total War


 internal division and disloyalty than the North, he refrained from declaring martial law on his own authority, and the Confederate Congress allowed it to be applied only in limited areas and for short periods. As the war dragged on, Davis’s political and popular support eroded. He was opposed and obstructed by state governors who resisted conscription and other Confederate policies that violated the tradition of states’ rights. The Confederate Congress served as a forum for bitter attacks on the administration’s conduct of the war, and by 1863 a majority of southern newspapers were taking an anti-Davis stand. Even if he had been a more able and inspiring leader, Davis would have had difficulty maintaining his authority because he did not have an organized party behind him to mobilize popular support for his policies.

Early Campaigns and Battles
 The war’s first major battle was a disaster for northern arms. Against his better judgment, General Winfield Scott ordered poorly trained Union troops to advance against the Confederate forces gathered at Manassas Junction, Virginia. They attacked the enemy position near Bull Run Creek on July 21, 1861, and seemed on their way to victory until nine thousand Confederate reinforcements arrived. After Confederate General Thomas J. Jackson had earned the nickname “Stonewall” for holding the line against the northern assault, the augmented southern army counterattacked and routed the invading force. As they retreated toward Washington, the raw Union troops gave in to panic and broke ranks in their stampede to safety. The humiliating defeat at Bull Run led to a shake-up of the northern high command. The man of the hour was George McClellan, who first became commander of troops in the Washington area and then became general in chief when Scott retired. A cautious disciplinarian, McClellan spent the fall and winter drilling his troops and whipping them into shape. President Lincoln, who could not understand why McClellan was taking so long to go into the field, became increasingly impatient and finally tried to order the army into action. Before McClellan made his move, Union forces in the West won important victories. In February 1862, a joint military– naval operation commanded by General Ulysses S. Grant captured Fort Henry on the Tennessee River and Fort Donelson on the Cumberland. Fourteen thousand prisoners were taken at Donelson, and the Confederate army was forced to withdraw from Kentucky and middle Tennessee. Southern forces in the West then massed at Corinth, Mississippi, just across the border from Tennessee. When a slow-moving Union army arrived just north of the Mississippi state line, the South launched a surprise attack on April 6. In the battle of Shiloh, one of the bloodiest of the war, only the timely arrival of reinforcements prevented the annihilation of Union troops backed up against the Tennessee River. After a second day of fierce fighting, the Confederates retreated to Corinth, leaving the enemy forces battered and exhausted. Although the Union’s military effort to seize control of the Mississippi Valley was temporarily halted at Shiloh, the Union navy soon contributed dramatically to the pursuit of that objective. On April 26, a fleet under Flag Officer David Farragut,



 coming up from the Gulf, captured the Port of New Orleans after boldly running past the forts below the city. The occupation of New Orleans, besides securing the mouth of the Mississippi, climaxed a series of naval and amphibious operations around the edges of the Confederacy that had already succeeded in capturing South Carolina’s Sea Islands and North Carolina’s Roanoke Island. Strategically located bases were thus available to enforce a blockade of the southern coast. The last serious challenge to the North’s naval supremacy ended on March 9, 1862, when the Confederate ironclad vessel Virginia (originally the USS Merrimac)—which had demolished wooden-hulled northern ships in the vicinity of Hampton Roads, Virginia—was repulsed by the Monitor, an armored and turreted Union gunship. Successes around the edges of the Confederacy did not relieve northern frustration at the inactivity or failure of Union forces on the eastern front. Only after Lincoln had relieved him of supreme command and ordered him to take the offensive at the head of the Army of the Potomac did McClellan start campaigning. He moved his forces by water to the peninsula southeast of Richmond, and began moving up the peninsula in early April 1862. For a month he was bogged down before Yorktown, which he chose to besiege rather than assault directly. After Yorktown fell on May 4, he pushed ahead to a point twenty miles from Richmond, where he awaited the additional troops that he expected Lincoln to send. The reinforcements were not forthcoming. While McClellan was inching his way up the peninsula, a relatively small southern force under Stonewall Jackson was on the rampage in the Shenandoah Valley, where it succeeded in pinning down a much larger Union army and defeating its detached units in a series of lightning moves. When it appeared by late May that Jackson might be poised to march east and attack the Union capital, Lincoln decided to withhold troops from McClellan so they would be available to defend Washington. If McClellan had moved more boldly and decisively, he probably could have captured Richmond with the forces he had. But a combination of faulty intelligence reports and his own natural caution led him to falter in the face of what he wrongly believed to be superior numbers. At the end of May, the Confederates under Joseph E. Johnston took the offensive. During the battle, General Johnston was severely wounded; succeeding him in command of the Confederate Army of Northern Virginia was native Virginian and West Point graduate Robert E. Lee. Toward the end of June, Lee began an all-out effort to expel McClellan from the outskirts of Richmond. In a series of battles that lasted for seven days, the two armies clawed at each other indecisively. Although McClellan repulsed Lee’s final assaults at Malvern Hill, the Union general decided to retreat down the peninsula to a more secure base. This backward step convinced Lincoln that the peninsula campaign was an exercise in futility. On July 11, Lincoln appointed General Henry W. Halleck, who had been in overall command in the western theater, to be the new general in chief and through Halleck ordered McClellan to withdraw his troops from the peninsula and send reinforcements to an army under General John Pope that was preparing to move on Richmond by the overland route. At the end of August, in the second battle fought near Bull Run, Lee established his reputation for brilliant generalship; he sent Stonewall Jackson to Pope’s rear, provoked

 Complete the Assignment Soldiering in the Civil War on myhistorylab

Feature
Essay


Soldiering in the
Civil War


 Youthful idealism is still evident on the faces of these young Civil War soldiers who had not yet learned General Sherman’s message that “war is hell.”

E


 arly in the Civil War, William Tecumseh Sherman told an audience of fresh-faced recruits, “There’s many a boy here today who looks on war as all glory, but, boys, it is all hell.” Letters from Civil War soldiers reveal that Sherman’s lesson was painfully learned by young men in both armies over the four years of conflict. At the outset, the firing on Fort Sumter infected both North and South with war fever. What later became a national nightmare began as a glorious defense of home and country. Young men rushed to join up in great numbers, taxing the ability of the authorities to process enlistments. In contrast to the typical soldier of modern warfare, many of the early Civil War volunteers had well-developed ideas of what the war was about. On both sides, such troops formed a core of stalwart soldiers who were committed

 to the ideological and political implications of the struggle. In the democratic atmosphere of the nineteenth century, when governments had little power to coerce citizen-soldiers, neither army could have sustained four years of brutal fighting if significant numbers of their troops did not genuinely believe in their side’s cause. The ideologically motivated troops may have accounted for about half of the fighting force. The other half was another matter. As with any large military force, the Union and Confederate armies struggled to motivate and discipline men who cared little for the principles at the root of the conflict. Such soldiers, who were typically drafted, cajoled, or bribed into service, found numerous ways to avoid the dangers of combat. Known as skulkers and sneaks, these reluctant troops could avoid combat by feigning sickness,

 hiding, hanging back, asking for “bomb-proof” assignments, or simply deserting in droves. The bad blood between such soldiers and those who fervently believed in the war effort could be intense. But the skulker and the ideologue shared one thing in common: Neither was fully prepared for the rigors of war. Early Union defeats and a strategic stalemate not only ended talk in both the North and the South of a “short engagement filled with glory” but also revealed how undisciplined the troops were. Of the more than three million Civil War servicemen, two-thirds were younger than twenty-three years of age and came from rural areas. They were not accustomed to the regimentation necessary to military life; as a young recruit from Illinois put it, “It comes rather hard at first to be deprived of liberty.” Inadequate leadership, as well

 as the beginnings of war weariness and the arrival of letters from home pleading for help with the harvest, led to a degree of military anarchy. The early battles were contests among armed mobs that might break and run with little provocation. Moreover, the long casualty lists from the early battles discouraged new waves of enlistments. Both governments hit on similar methods of recruiting and disciplining troops. Enlistment and reenlistment bounties were instituted, and the nation’s first conscription laws were passed. The dual aim was to maintain the ranks of the original volunteers while at the same time stimulating more enlistments. Terms of service were lengthened, in most cases to three years, and all nonenlisted men of military age were registered and called on to either volunteer or be faced with the disgrace of being drafted. Although some Southerners were exempted to oversee their large numbers of slaves, and Northerners could escape military duty by paying a $300 fee, the laws did spur enlistments. Between 1861 and 1865, more than half of the nation’s 5.5 million men of military age were mustered into service. The solution to the problem of training the troops was the army training camp. With its “50,000 pup tents and wigwams,” the camp was the volunteer’s way station between home and battlefield. It was the place the raw recruit received his first bitter taste of the tedium, hardship, and deprivation of soldiering. “A soldier is not his own man,” a Louisiana recruit wrote, astonished at how markedly camp routines differed from civilian life. “He has given up all claim on himself . . . . I will give you a little information concerning every day business. consider yourself a private soldier and in camp . . . the drum beats for drill. you fall in and start. you here feel youre inferirority.

 even the Sargeants is hollering at you close up; Ketch step. dress to the right, and sutch like.” Professional noncommissioned officers from the peacetime army were used, more effectively by the Union, to turn men into soldiers who could fire a rifle and understand simple commands. The liberal use of the court-martial and the board of review enabled the professional soldiers to rid the army of its most incompetent officer-politicians and instill discipline in the ranks. Many recruits spent their entire terms of service within the tent cities, forming a reserve on which field commanders could call to replace casualties. The camps were themselves the sites of hundreds of thousands of Civil War casualties. Fewer men died of battle wounds than of dysentery, typhoid fever, and other waterborne diseases contracted in the camps, which were often located on swampy land without adequate fresh water. The army food was always the butt of soldier humor— one soldier complained the beef issued to him must have been carved from a bull “too old for the conscript law”—but it was also the source of its own set of diseases, particularly scurvy. Men in the field were condemned to a diet of “hardtack and half-cooked beans,” and no soldier could expect to receive fresh fruit or vegetables. But food became steadily more plentiful in the Union camps, and doctors, officers, and agents of the U.S. Sanitary Commission teamed up to improve camp cleanliness. “Johnny Reb,” however, had to survive under steadily worsening conditions. The Confederate supply system did not improve significantly during the course of the war and grew worse wherever the North invaded or blockaded. Nevertheless, the battlefield performance of fighting men on the two sides remained roughly on a par throughout the war.

 Camp lessons were often forgotten in the heat of battle, particularly by green troops who “saw the elephant” (went into battle for the first time) and ran from it like the youth in Stephen Crane’s The Red Badge of Courage. A Mississippian anxiously admitted after his first fight that “though i did not run i mite have if i had thought of it in time.” The Union’s ability to call more new men into service may have guaranteed ultimate victory, but it meant that battle-hardened Confederate veterans faced large numbers of raw northern recruits in every major battle. Since experience often counted for more than basic training and equipment, southern troops could expect to engage the enemy on fairly equal terms. The Civil War was the most costly and brutal struggle in which American soldiers have ever been engaged. More American servicemen died in that war (618,000) than in the two world wars and Korea combined and was not surpassed until well into the Vietnam War. Contests were decided by deadly charges in which muskets were exploded at such close range as to sear the faces of the contestants. The survivors, in their letters home, attempted to describe the inhuman events, but, as a Maine soldier wrote to his parents after the battle of Gettysburg, “You can form no idea of a battlefield . . . . no pen can describe it. No tongue can tell its horror[.] I hope none of my brothers will ever have to go into a fight.”

QUESTIONS FOR DISCUSSION 1.
What did the “stalwart soldiers” on each side believe they were fighting for? 2. How did the experience of war change how the typical soldier thought and acted after the war was over? 


 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 PA.

Antietam
Sept. 17, 1862


 OHIO

Bull Run
July 21, 1861
Aug. 29–30, 1862


Winchester
May 25, 1862


Kernstown


Washington, D.C.


 Jackson’s Valley Campaign

Apr
 il Ju Ma ne y

Mar. 23, 1862


Cross Keys


Fredericksburg
Dec. 13, 1862


Lee


Mc
C


Cedar Mountain


 llan le

Lee
Jacks
 on

June 8, 1862


Richmond


Aug. 9, 1862


Seven Pines


James R.


May 31–July 1, 1862
Fortress
Monroe


Seven Days’ Battles


 VIRGINIA

June 25–July 1, 1862


 PENNSYLVANIA

Yorktown
 besieged Apr. 5–May 4, 1862

 OHIO

Monitor vs. Merrimac (Virginia)


Washington, D.C.


Mar. 9, 1862
Oh


NORTH CAROLINA

 io R.

 VIRGINIA

Richmond


Louisville
James R.


Ft. Henry
Paducah


 MISSOURI

Fortress
Monroe


 KENTUCKY

Feb. 6, 1862


Ft. Donelson


Cairo


Feb. 16, 1862


Island No. 10
Apr. 8, 1862


Nashville


 TENNESSEE

NORTH CAROLINA

 e ll Bu

Memphis


Shiloh


June 6, 1862


Apr. 6–7, 1862
Corinth


A.S


. Joh
 nston

SOUTH CAROLINA

R.
Be
 au re ga

 rd

 ARKANSAS

Ft. Sumter


Bragg


Mississippi




 ALABAMA

Apr. 12–13, 1861


 GEORGIA

Vicksburg


 MISSISSIPPI

AT L A N T I C OCEAN
Mobile 
 LOUISIANA

New Orleans
 captured Apr. 26, 1862

Farr
 agu t





Gulf of Mexico


 200 miles

 FLORIDA

 200 kilometers

 Union troop movements

 Confederate troop movements

 Union blockade

 Confederate troop retreat

 Union victories

 Confederate victories

CIVIL WAR, 1861–1862

 Defeats on the battlefield forced a change in the Union’s initial military campaign of capturing Richmond, the Confederate capital. The Union’s targets in the West were the key cities of Vicksburg and New Orleans.

Fight to the Finish


 the rash Union general to attack Jackson with full force, and then threw the main Confederate army against the Union’s flank. Badly beaten, Pope retreated to the defenses of Washington, where he was stripped of command. Out of sheer desperation, Lincoln reappointed McClellan to head the Army of the Potomac. Lee proceeded to lead his exuberant troops on an invasion of Maryland, in the hope of isolating Washington from the rest of the North. McClellan caught up with him near Sharpsburg, and the bloodiest one-day battle of the war ensued. When the smoke cleared at Antietam on September 17, almost five thousand men had been killed on the two sides and more than eighteen thousand wounded. The result was a draw, but Lee was forced to fall back south of the Potomac to protect his dangerously extended supply lines. McClellan was slow in pursuit, and Lincoln blamed him for letting the enemy escape. Convinced that McClellan was fatally infected with “the slows,” Lincoln once again sought a more aggressive general and put Ambrose E. Burnside in command of the Army of the Potomac. Burnside was aggressive enough, but he was also rather dense. His limitations were disastrously revealed at the Battle of Fredericksburg, Virginia, on December 13, 1862, when he launched a direct assault to try to capture an entrenched and elevated position. Throughout the Civil War, such uphill charges almost invariably failed because of the range and deadly accuracy of small-arms fire when concentrated on exposed troops. The debacle at Fredericksburg, where Union forces suffered more than twice as many casualties as their opponents, ended a year of bitter failure for the North on the eastern front.

The Diplomatic Struggle
 The critical period of Civil War diplomacy was 1861 to 1862, when the South was making every effort to induce major foreign powers to recognize its independence and break the Union blockade. The hope that England and France could be persuaded to intervene on the Confederate side stemmed from the fact that these nations depended on the South for three-quarters of their cotton supply. The Confederate commissioners sent to England and France in May 1861 succeeded in gaining recognition of southern “belligerency,” which meant the new government could claim some international rights of a nation at war. The main advantage of belligerent status was that it permitted the South to purchase and outfit privateers in neutral ports. As a result, Confederate raiders built and armed in British shipyards devastated northern shipping to such an extent that insurance costs eventually forced most of the American merchant marine off the high seas for the duration of the war. In the fall of 1861, the Confederate government dispatched James M. Mason and John Slidell to be its permanent envoys to England and France, respectively. A U.S. warship stopped and boarded the British steamer Trent, on which they were traveling, and Mason and Slidell were taken into U.S. custody. This flagrant violation of its maritime rights almost led England to declare war on the United States. After a few weeks of ferocious posturing by both sides, Lincoln and Secretary of State Seward made the prudent decision to release Mason and Slidell. These envoys may as well have stayed at home; they failed in their mission to obtain full recognition of the Confederacy from



 either England or France. The anticipated cotton shortage was slow to develop, for the bumper crop of 1860 had created a large surplus in British and French warehouses. While Napoleon III, the emperor of France, personally favored the southern cause, he was unwilling to risk war with the United States without British support. Although sympathetic to the South, the British feared the consequences of recognition or support for the Confederacy. In September 1862, the British cabinet debated mediation and recognition as serious possibilities. But they hesitated to intervene unless the South won decisively on the battlefield. The cotton famine finally hit in late 1862, causing massive unemployment in the British textile industry. But, contrary to southern hopes, public opinion did not compel the government to abandon its neutrality and use force to break the Union blockade. Influential interest groups actually benefited from the famine, including owners of large cotton mills, who had made extravagant profits on their existing stocks and were happy to see weaker competitors go under while they awaited new sources of supply. By early 1863, cotton from Egypt and India put the industry back on the track toward full production. By early 1863, when it was clear that “King Cotton diplomacy” had failed, the Confederacy broke off formal relations with Great Britain. Its hopes for foreign intervention came to nothing because the European powers acted out of self-interest and calculated that the advantages of getting involved were not worth the risk of a long and costly war with the United States. Only a decisive military victory would have gained recognition for southern independence, and if the Confederacy had actually won such a victory, it would not have needed foreign backing.

Fight to the Finish
 How did the Union finally attain victory, and what role did emancipation play in it? The last two and a half years of the struggle saw the implementation of more radical war measures. The most dramatic and important of these was the North’s effort to follow through on Lincoln’s decision to free the slaves and bring the black population into the war on the Union side. The tide of battle turned in the summer of 1863, but the South continued to resist valiantly for two more years, until it was finally overcome by the sheer weight of the North’s advantages in manpower and resources.

The Coming of Emancipation
 At the beginning of the war, when the North still hoped for a quick and easy victory, only dedicated abolitionists favored turning the struggle for the Union into a crusade against slavery. In the summer of 1861, Congress voted almost unanimously for a resolution affirming that the war was being fought only to preserve the Union and not to change the domestic institutions of any state. But as it became clear how hard it was going to be to subdue the “rebels,” sentiment developed for striking a blow at the South’s economic and social system by freeing its slaves. In a tentative move toward emancipation, Congress in July 1862 authorized the government to confiscate the slaves of masters who supported the Confederacy.



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 By this time, the actions of the slaves themselves were influencing policy making. They were voting for freedom with their feet by deserting their plantations in areas where the Union forces were close enough to offer a haven. In this way, they put pressure on the government to determine their status and, in effect, offered themselves as a source of manpower to the Union on the condition that they be made free. Although Lincoln favored freedom for blacks as an ultimate goal, he was reluctant to commit his administration to a policy of immediate emancipation. In the fall of 1861 and again in the spring of 1862, he disallowed the orders of field commanders who sought to free slaves in areas occupied by their forces, thus angering abolitionists and the strongly antislavery Republicans known as Radicals. Lincoln’s caution stemmed from a fear of alienating Unionist elements in the border slave states and from his own preference for a gradual, compensated form of emancipation. He hoped that such a plan could be put into effect in loyal slaveholding areas and then extended to the rebellious states as the basis for a voluntary restoration of the Union. Lincoln was also aware of the strong racial prejudice of most whites in both the North and the South. Although personally more tolerant than most white Americans, Lincoln was pessimistic about prospects of equality for blacks in the United States. He therefore coupled a proposal for gradual emancipation with a plea for government subsidies to support the voluntary “colonization” of freed blacks outside of the United States. But the slaveholding states that remained loyal to the Union refused to endorse Lincoln’s gradual plan, and the failure of Union arms in the spring and summer of 1862 increased the public

Read the Document


 clamor for striking directly at the South’s peculiar institution. The Lincoln administration also realized that emancipation would win sympathy for the Union cause in England and France and thus might counter the growing threat that these nations would come to the aid of the Confederacy. In July, Lincoln drafted an emancipation proclamation and read it to his cabinet, but he was persuaded by Secretary of State Seward not to issue it until the North had won a victory and could not be accused of acting out of desperation. Later in the summer, Lincoln responded publicly to critics of his cautious policy, indicating that he would take any action in regard to slavery that would further the Union cause. Finally, on September 22, 1862, Lincoln issued his preliminary Emancipation Proclamation. McClellan’s success in stopping Lee at Antietam provided the occasion, but the president was also responding to growing political pressures. Most Republican politicians were now firmly committed to an emancipation policy, and many were on the verge of repudiating the administration for its inaction. Had Lincoln failed to act, his party would have been badly split, and he would have been in the minority faction. The proclamation gave the Confederate states one hundred days to give up the struggle without losing their slaves. There was little chance they would do so, but in offering them the chance, Lincoln left the door open for a more conservative and peaceful way of ending slavery than sudden emancipation at the point of a gun. In December, Lincoln proposed to Congress that it approve a series of constitutional amendments providing for gradual, compensated emancipation and subsidized colonization. Since there was no response from the South and little enthusiasm in Congress for Lincoln’s gradual plan, the president

The Emancipation Proclamation (1863)


 In this allegorical painting, President Lincoln extends a copy of his proclamation to the goddess of liberty who is driving her chariot, Emancipation.

Fight to the Finish


 went ahead on January 1, 1863, and declared that all slaves in those areas under Confederate control “shall be . . . thenceforward, and forever free.” He justified the final proclamation as an act of “military necessity” sanctioned by the war powers of the president, and he authorized the enlistment of freed slaves in the Union army. The language and tone of the document—one historian has described it as having “all the moral grandeur of a bill of lading”— made it clear that blacks were being freed for reasons of state and not out of humanitarian conviction. The proclamation did not extend to slave states loyal to the Union or to occupied areas and thus did not immediately free a single slave. However, it did commit the Union to the abolition of slavery as a war aim. It also accelerated the breakdown of slavery as a labor system, a process that was already well under way by early 1863. The blacks who had remained in captured areas or deserted their masters to cross Union lines before 1863 had been kept in a kind of way station

View the Closer Look




 between slavery and freedom, in accordance with the theory that they were “contraband of war.” As word spread among the slaves that emancipation was now official policy, larger numbers of them were inspired to run off and seek the protection of approaching northern armies. One slave who crossed the Union lines summed up their motives: “I wants to be free. I came in from the plantation and don’t want to go back; . . . I don’t want to be a slave again.” Approximately one-quarter of the slave population gained freedom during the war under the terms of the Emancipation Proclamation and thus deprived the South of an important part of its agricultural workforce.

African Americans and the War
 Almost two hundred thousand African Americans, most of them newly freed slaves, eventually served in the Union armed forces and made a vital contribution to the North’s victory. Without

Black Union Soldiers


 This lithograph depicts the 54th Massachusetts Volunteer Regiment engaged in the assault on Fort Wagner, South Carolina on July 18, 1863. The regiment was one of the first official black units of the Union Army during the Civil War and saw extensive service during the war.



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 them it is doubtful that the Union could have been preserved. Although they were enrolled in segregated units under white officers, were initially paid less than their white counterparts, and were used disproportionately for garrison duty or heavy labor behind the lines, “blacks in blue” fought heroically in several major battles during the last two years of the war. One of the most celebrated was the unsuccessful but heroic assault on Fort Wagner in the harbor of Charleston, South Carolina, in July 1863. The casualty rate for the 54th Massachusetts Colored Regiment exceeded 50 percent. Among the dead was the young white commander, Robert Gould Shaw, who became an abolitionist martyr. The assistant secretary of war observed blacks in action at Millikin’s Bend on the Mississippi in June 1863 and reported that “the bravery of blacks in the battle . . . completely revolutionized the sentiment of the army with regard to the employment of Negro troops.” Those freed during the war who did not serve in the military were often conscripted to serve as contract wage laborers on cotton plantations owned or leased by “loyal” white planters within the occupied areas of the Deep South. Abolitionists protested that the coercion used by military authorities to get blacks back into the cotton fields amounted to slavery in a new form, but those in power argued that the necessities of war and the northern economy required such “temporary” arrangements. To some extent, regimentation of the freedmen within the South was a way of assuring racially prejudiced Northerners, especially in the Midwest, that emancipation would not result in a massive migration of black refugees to their region of the country. The heroic performance of African American troops and the easing of northern fears of being swamped by black migrants led to a deepening commitment to emancipation as a permanent and comprehensive policy. Realizing that his proclamation had a shaky constitutional foundation and might apply only to slaves actually freed while the war was going on, Lincoln sought to organize and recognize loyal state governments in southern areas under Union control on the condition that they abolish slavery in their constitutions. He also encouraged local campaigns to emancipate the slaves in the border states and saw these programs triumph in Maryland and Missouri in 1864. Finally, Lincoln pressed for an amendment to the federal constitution outlawing involuntary servitude. After supporting its inclusion as a central plank in the Republican platform of 1864, Lincoln used all his influence to win congressional approval for the new Thirteenth Amendment. On January 31, 1865, the House narrowly approved the amendment. There was an explosion of joy on the floor and in the galleries, and then the House voted to adjourn for the rest of the day “in honor of this immortal and sublime event.” The cause of freedom for blacks and the cause of the Union had at last become one and the same. Lincoln, despite his earlier hesitations and misgivings, had earned the right to go down in history as the Great Emancipator.

The Tide Turns
 By early 1863, the Confederate economy was in shambles and its diplomacy had collapsed. The social order of the South was also severely strained. Masters were losing control of their slaves,

 and nonslaveholding whites were becoming disillusioned with the hardships of a war that some of them described as “a rich man’s war and a poor man’s fight.” As slaves fled from the plantations, increasing numbers of lower-class whites deserted the army or refused to be drafted in the first place. Whole counties in the southern backcountry became “deserter havens,” which Confederate officials could enter only at the risk of their lives. Appalachian mountaineers, who had remained loyal to the Union, resisted the Confederacy more directly by enlisting in the Union army or joining guerrilla units operating behind southern lines. Yet the North was slow to capitalize on the South’s internal weaknesses because it had its own serious morale problems. The long series of defeats on the eastern front had engendered war weariness, and the new policies that “military necessity” forced the government to adopt encountered fierce opposition. Although popular with Republicans, emancipation was viewed by most Democrats as a betrayal of northern war aims. Racism was a main ingredient in their opposition to freeing blacks. According to one Democratic senator, “We mean that the United States . . . shall be the white man’s home . . . and the nigger shall never be his equal.” Riding a backlash against the preliminary proclamation, Democrats made significant gains in the congressional elections of 1862, especially in the Midwest, where they also captured several state legislatures. The Enrollment Act of March 1863, which provided for outright conscription of white males but permitted men of wealth to hire substitutes or pay a fee to avoid military service, provoked a violent response from those unable to buy their way out of service and unwilling to “fight for the niggers.” A series of antidraft riots broke out, culminating in one of the bloodiest domestic disorders in American history—the New York Riot of July 1863. The New York mob, composed mainly of IrishAmerican laborers, burned the draft offices, the homes of leading Republicans, and an orphanage for black children. Th ey also lynched more than a dozen defenseless blacks. At least 120 people died before federal troops restored order. Besides racial prejudice, the draft riots also reflected working-class anger at the wartime privileges and prosperity of the middle and upper classes; they exposed deep divisions in the North on the administration’s conduct of the war. To fight dissension and “disloyalty,” the government used its martial law authority to arrest a few alleged ringleaders, including one prominent Democratic congressman—Clement Vallandigham of Ohio. Private patriotic organizations also issued a barrage of propaganda aimed at what they believed was a vast secret conspiracy to undermine the northern war effort. Historians disagree about the real extent of covert and illegal antiwar activity. No vast conspiracy existed, but militant advocates of “peace at any price”—popularly known as Copperheads—were certainly active in some areas, especially among the immigrant working classes of large cities and in southern Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois. Many Copperheads presented themselves as Jeffersonian believers in limited government who feared a war-induced growth of federal power. But it was opposition to emancipation on racial grounds rather than anxiety about big government that gave the movement most of its emotional force.

Fight to the Finish


Read the Document




 “If it were not for my trust in Christ,” Testimony from the New York Draft Riots (1863)

 An 1863 draft call in New York provoked violence against African Americans, viewed by the rioters as the cause of an unnecessary war, and rage against the rich men who had been able to buy exemptions from the draft. This 1863 illustration from Harper’s Weekly depicts a mob lynching a black man on Clarkson Street in New York City. Source: Collection of The New-York Historical Society.

 The only effective way to overcome the disillusionment that fed the peace movement was to start winning battles and thus convince the northern public that victory was assured. Before this could happen, the North suffered one more humiliating defeat on the eastern front. In early May 1863, Union forces under General Joseph Hooker were routed at Chancellorsville, Virginia, by a Confederate army less than half its size. Once again, Robert E. Lee demonstrated his superior generalship, this time by dividing his forces and sending Stonewall Jackson to make a devastating surprise attack on the Union right. The Confederacy prevailed, but it did suffer one major loss: Jackson himself died as a result of wounds he received in the battle. In the West, however, a major Union triumph was taking shape. For more than a year, General Ulysses S. Grant had been trying to put his forces in position to capture Vicksburg, Mississippi, the almost inaccessible Confederate bastion that stood between the North and control of the Mississippi River. Finally, in late March 1863, he crossed to the west bank north of the city and moved his forces to a point south of it, where he joined up with naval forces that had run the Confederate batteries mounted on Vicksburg’s high bluffs. In one of the boldest campaigns of the war, Grant

 crossed the river, deliberately cutting himself off from his sources of supply, and marched into the interior of Mississippi. Living off the land and out of communication with an anxious and perplexed Lincoln, his troops won a series of victories over two separate Confederate armies and advanced on Vicksburg from the east. After unsuccessfully assaulting the city’s defenses, Grant settled down for a siege on May 22. The Confederate government considered and rejected proposals to mount a major offensive into Tennessee and Kentucky in the hope of drawing Grant away from Vicksburg. Instead, President Davis approved Robert E. Lee’s plan for an all-out invasion of the Northeast. Although this option provided no hope for relieving Vicksburg, it might lead to a dramatic victory that would more than compensate for the probable loss of the Mississippi stronghold. Lee’s army crossed the Potomac in June and kept going until it reached Gettysburg, Pennsylvania. There Lee confronted a Union army that had taken up strong defensive positions on Cemetery Ridge and Culp’s Hill. This was one of the few occasions in the war when the North could capitalize on the tactical advantage of choosing its ground and then defending it against an enemy whose supply lines were extended.



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

 On July 2, a series of Confederate attacks failed to dislodge Union troops from the high ground they occupied. The following day, Lee faced the choice of retreating to protect his lines of communication or launching a final, desperate assault. With more boldness than wisdom, he chose to make a direct attack on the strongest part of the Union line. The resulting charge on Cemetery Ridge was disastrous; advancing Confederate soldiers dropped like flies under the barrage of Union artillery and rifle fire. Only a few made it to the top of the ridge, and they were killed or captured. Retreat was now inevitable, and Lee withdrew his battered troops to the Potomac, only to find that the river was at flood stage and could not be crossed for several days. But Meade failed to follow up his victory with a vigorous pursuit, and Lee was allowed to escape a predicament that could have resulted in his annihilation. Vicksburg fell to Grant on July 4, the same day Lee began his withdrawal, and Northerners rejoiced at the simultaneous Independence Day victories that turned the tide of the war. The Union had secured control of the Mississippi and had at last won a major battle in the East. But Lincoln’s joy turned to frustration when he learned his generals had missed the chance to capture Lee’s army and bring a quick end to the war.

Last Stages of the Conflict
 Grant’s victories in the West earned him promotion to generalin-chief of all the Union armies. After assuming that position in March 1864, he ordered a multipronged offensive to finish off the Confederacy. The offensive’s main movements were a march on Richmond under Grant’s personal command and a thrust by the western armies, now led by General William Tecumseh Sherman, toward Atlanta and the heart of Georgia. In May and early June, Grant and Lee fought a series of bloody battles in northern Virginia that tended to follow a set pattern. Lee would take up an entrenched position in the path of the invading force, and Grant would attack it, sustaining heavy losses but also inflicting Confederate casualties. When his direct assault had failed, Grant would move to his left, hoping in vain to maneuver Lee into a less defensible position. In the battles of the Wilderness, Spotsylvania, and Cold Harbor, the Union lost about sixty thousand men—more than twice the number of Confederate casualties— without defeating Lee or opening the road to Richmond. Grant decided to change his tactics, moving his army to the south of Richmond and settling down for a siege. The siege of Petersburg was a long, drawn-out affair, and the resulting stalemate in the East caused northern morale to plummet during the summer of 1864. Lincoln was facing reelection, and his failure to end the war dimmed his prospects. Lincoln confronted growing opposition within his own party, especially from Radicals who disagreed with his apparently lenient approach to the future restoration of seceded states to the Union. After Lincoln vetoed a Radical-supported congressional reconstruction plan in July, some Radicals began to call for a new convention to nominate another candidate. The Democrats seemed to be in a good position to capitalize on Republican divisions and make a strong bid for the White House. Their platform appealed to war weariness by calling for a

 cease-fire followed by negotiations to reestablish the Union. The party’s nominee, General George McClellan, announced he would not be bound by the peace plank and would pursue the war. But he promised to end the conflict sooner than Lincoln could because he would not insist on emancipation as a condition for reconstruction. By late summer, Lincoln confessed privately that he would probably be defeated. But northern military successes changed the political outlook. Sherman’s invasion of Georgia went well; between May and September, he employed a series of skillful flanking movements to force the Confederates to retreat to the outskirts of Atlanta. On September 2, the city fell, and northern forces occupied the hub of the Deep South. The news unified the Republican party behind Lincoln and improved his chances for defeating McClellan in November. The election itself was almost an anticlimax: Lincoln won 212 of a possible 233 electoral votes and 55 percent of the popular vote. The Republican cause of “liberty and Union” was secure.

THE ELECTION OF 1864
Candidate Lincoln McClellan 
Party
Republican
Democratic


Popular Vote
2,213,655
1,805,237


Electoral
Vote


 *Out of a total of 233 electoral votes. The eleven secessionist states— Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Louisiana, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Texas, and Virginia—did not vote.

 The concluding military operations revealed the futility of further southern resistance. Cutting himself off from his supply lines and living off the land, Sherman marched unopposed through Georgia to the sea, destroying almost everything of possible military or economic value in a corridor three hundred miles long and sixty miles wide. The Confederate army that had opposed him at Atlanta, now under the command of General John B. Hood, moved northward into Tennessee, where it was defeated and almost destroyed by Union forces under General George Thomas at Nashville in midDecember. Sherman captured Savannah on December 22 and presented the city to Lincoln as a Christmas present. He then turned north and carried his scorched-earth policy into South Carolina with the aim of continuing through North Carolina and eventually joining up with Grant at Petersburg near Richmond. While Sherman was bringing the war to the Carolinas, Grant finally ended the stalemate at Petersburg. When Lee’s starving and exhausted army tried to break through the Union lines, Grant renewed his attack and forced the Confederates to abandon Petersburg and Richmond on April 2, 1865. He then pursued them westward for a hundred miles, placing his forces in position to cut off their line of retreat to the South. Recognizing the hopelessness of further resistance, Lee surrendered his army at Appomattox Courthouse on April 9. But the joy of the victorious North turned to sorrow and anger when John Wilkes Booth, a pro-Confederate actor, assassinated Abraham Lincoln as the president watched a play at Ford’s Theater in Washington on April 14. Although Booth had a few

Fight to the Finish


View the Map


Gettysburg


Meade


 PA.

July 1–3, 1863


 oke Ho

WEST VIRGINIA

Washington, D.C.


 r

Lee


Stu
 ar t

 OHIO

The Civil War Part II: 1863–1865


Brandy Station
June 9, 1863


 a Gr

May 1–4, 1863


 nt

Lee


Chancellorsville


The Wilderness
May 5–6, 1864
Fredericksburg


Spotsylvania
Courthouse
May 8–19, 1864


Cold Harbor
Richmond


James R.
Appomattox
 armistice Apr. 9, 1865

Petersburg


Five Forks


 VIRGINIA

June 3, 1864


Apr. 1, 1865


 besieged June 1864–Apr. 1865

PENNSYLVANIA
Raleigh armistice Apr. 18, 1865 
OHIO
Washington, D.C. 
NORTH CAROLINA
Oh 
Bentonville
Mar. 19, 1865


J.E.
Johnston 

WEST VIRGINIA

 io R.

Richmond
James R.
Appomattox
 armistice Apr. 9, 1865

 KENTUCKY

 MISSOURI

Dec. 15–16, 1864


VIRGINIA
Raleigh armistice Apr. 18, 1865 
 TENNESSEE

Nashville


Fredericksburg


Murfreesboro


NORTH CAROLINA

Chattanooga
Nov. 23–25, 1863


Ho
 od

May 22–July 4, 1863


Gran


Siege of Vicksburg


 MISSISSIPPI

 t Mississippi

R.


 ARKANSAS

Grand Gulf


Chickamauga
Sept. 19–20, 1863


 Champion's Hill May 14, 1863

July 20, 22, 28, 1864
 occupied Sept. 2, 1864 She

May 16, 1863


Jackson


SOUTH CAROLINA

Atlanta


 rma

 n

 ALABAMA

J.E.
Johnston 

 GEORGIA

Pemberton
Grant


Savannah
 captured Dec. 22, 1864

Port Gibson
May 1, 1863


Mobile Bay


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

Aug. 5, 1864


 LOUISIANA





 200 miles

Gulf of Mexico


 FLORIDA

 200 kilometers

 Union troop movements

 Confederate troop movements

 Union blockade

 Confederate troop retreat

 Union victories

 Confederate victories

CIVIL WAR, 1863–1865
In the western theater of war, Grant’s victories at Port Gibson, Jackson, and Champion’s Hill cleared the way for his siege of Vicksburg. In the east, after the hard-won Union victory at Gettysburg, the South never again invaded the North. In 1864 and 1865, Union armies gradually closed in on Lee’s Confederate forces in Virginia. Leaving Atlanta in flames, Sherman marched to the Georgia coast, took Savannah, then moved his troops north through the Carolinas. Grant’s army, though suffering enormous losses, moved on toward Richmond, marching into the Confederate capital on April 3, 1865, and forcing surrender. 




 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

Read the Document


William T. Sherman, the March Through Georgia


 This illustration depicts General William Tecumseh Sherman's successful Union Army march through Georgia from May 1864 to December 1864. Sherman's destruction of almost all valuable military and economic assets in Georgia and later in the Carolinas during this period broke the will of continued resistance by Southern forces.

 accomplices—one of whom attempted to murder Secretary of State Seward—popular theories that the assassination was the result of a vast conspiracy involving Confederate leaders or (according to another version) Radical Republicans have never been substantiated. The man who had advocated sacrifice for the Union cause at Gettysburg had himself given “the last full measure of devotion” to the cause of “government of the people, by the people, for the people.” Four days after Lincoln’s death, the only remaining Confederate force of any significance (the troops under Joseph E. Johnston, who had been opposing Sherman in North Carolina) laid down its arms. The Union was saved.

Effects of the War
 How did the outcome of the war affect America socially and politically? The nation that emerged from four years of total war was not the same America that had split apart in 1861. Over 618,000 young men were in their graves, victims of enemy fire or the diseases

 that spread rapidly in military encampments in this era before modern medicine and sanitation. The widows and sweethearts they left behind temporarily increased the proportion of unmarried women in the population, and some members of this generation of involuntary “spinsters” sought new opportunities for making a living or serving the community that went beyond the purely domestic roles previously prescribed for women. During the war, northern women pushed the boundaries of their traditional roles by participating on the homefront as fund-raisers and in the rear lines as army nurses and members of the Sanitary Commission. The Sanitary Commission promoted health in the northern army’s camps through attention to cleanliness, nutrition, and medical care. However, women were not limited to playing roles as nurses and “angels of mercy.” Throughout the war, they also filled key positions in the administration and organization of patriotic organizations. Women in the North simultaneously utilized their traditional position as nurturers to participate in the war effort while they advanced new ideas about their role in society. The large number who had served as nurses or volunteer workers during the war were especially responsive to

Effects of the War


Watch the Video




The Meaning of the Civil War for Americans


 Over the past 150 years, Americans have given many different meanings to the Civil War. For some in the South, it was the “Lost Cause,” a romantic contest of fallen heroes. Even some Northerners came to accept this view of the conflict in the decades afterward. Today, we celebrate the end of slavery but mourn the terrible loss of life in that bloody war.

 calls for broadening “the woman’s sphere.” Some of the northern women who were prominent in wartime service organizations— such as Louise Lee Schuyler, Josephine Shaw Lowell, and Mary Livermore—became leaders of postwar philanthropic and reform movements. The war did not destroy the barriers to sexual equality that had long existed in American society, but the efforts of women during the Civil War broadened beliefs about what women could accomplish outside of the home. The effect on white women in the Confederacy was different from the effect of the war on women in the victorious North. Southern women had always been intimately involved in the administration of

 the farms and plantations of the South, but the coming of the war forced them to shoulder even greater burdens. This was true for wealthy plantation mistresses, who took over the administration and maintenance of huge plantations without the benefit of extensive training or the assistance of male relatives. The wives of small farmers found it hard to survive at all, especially at harvest time when they often had to do all the work themselves. The loss of fathers and brothers, the constant advance of Union troops, and the difficulty of controlling a slave labor force destroyed many southern women’s allegiance to the Confederate cause. At the close of the conflict, southern women faced the challenge of rebuilding a society that had been



 CHAPTER 15

SECESSION AND THE CIVIL WAR

CASUALTIES OF WAR 1,556,678

Total
 strength

1,082,119
24%


 Death rate 23% Wounded nonmortally

 Died from wounds

 Died from disease

Union


275,175
100,000*


Confederacy


110,070
94,000*
249,458
164,000*


 *Confederate figures represent accepted estimates.

 permanently transformed by the experience of war. As in the North, the Civil War changed the situation of women in society. The devastation of the southern economy forced many women to play a more conspicuous public and economic role. These women responded by forming associations to assist returning soldiers, entering the workforce as educators, and establishing numerous benevolent and reform societies or temperance organizations. Although these changes created a more visible presence of southern women in public, the South remained more conservative in its views about women’s “proper place” than did the North. At enormous human and economic cost, the nation had emancipated four million African Americans from slavery, but it had not yet resolved that they would be equal citizens. At the time of Lincoln’s assassination, most northern states still denied blacks equality under the law and the right to vote. Whether the North would extend more rights to southern freedmen than it had granted to “free Negroes” was an open question. The impact of the war on white working people was also unclear. Those in the industrializing parts of the North had suffered and lost ground economically because prices had risen much faster than wages during the conflict. But Republican rhetoric emphasizing “equal opportunity” and the “dignity of labor” raised hopes that the crusade against slavery could be broadened into a movement to improve the lot of working people in general. Foreign-born workers had additional reason to be optimistic; the fact that so many immigrants had fought and died for the Union cause had—for the moment—weakened nativist sentiment and encouraged ethnic tolerance. What the war definitely decided was that the federal government was supreme over the states and had a broad grant of constitutional authority to act on matters affecting “the general welfare.” The southern principle of state sovereignty and strict construction died at Appomattox, and the United States was on its way to becoming a true nation-state with an effective central government. But it retained a federal structure; although states could no longer claim the right to secede or nullify federal law, they still had primary responsibility for most functions of government. Everyone agreed that the Constitution placed limits on what the national government could do, and questions would continue to arise about where federal authority ended and states’ rights began.

 A broadened definition of federal powers had its greatest impact in the realm of economic policy. During the war, the Republican-dominated Congresses passed a rash of legislation designed to give stimulus and direction to the nation’s economic development. Taking advantage of the absence of southern opposition, Republicans rejected the pre–Civil War tradition of virtual laissez-faire and enacted a Whiggish program of active support for business and agriculture. In 1862, Congress passed a high protective tariff, approved a homestead act intended to encourage settlement of the West by providing free land to settlers, granted huge tracts of public land to railroad companies to support the building of a transcontinental railroad, and gave the states land for the establishment of agricultural colleges. The following year, Congress set up a national banking system that required member banks to keep adequate reserves and invest one-third of their capital in government securities. The notes the national banks issued became the country’s first standardized and reliable circulating paper currency. These wartime achievements added up to a decisive shift in the relationship between the federal government and private enterprise. The Republicans took a limited government that did little more than seek to protect the marketplace from the threat of monopoly and changed it into an activist state that promoted and subsidized the efforts of the economically ambitious and industrious.

Conclusion: An Organizational
Revolution
 The most pervasive effect of the war on northern society was to encourage an “organizational revolution.” Aided by government policies, venturesome businessmen took advantage of the new national market created by military procurement to build larger firms that could operate across state lines; some of the huge corporate enterprises of the postwar era began to take shape. Philanthropists also developed more effective national associations; the most notable of these were the Sanitary and Christian Commissions that ministered to the physical and spiritual needs of the troops. Efforts to care for the wounded influenced the development of the modern hospital and the rise of nursing as a female profession. Both the men who served in the army and those men

Conclusion: An Organizational Revolution


 and women who supported them on the homefront or behind the lines became accustomed to working in large, bureaucratic organizations of a kind that had scarcely existed before the war. Ralph Waldo Emerson, the era’s most prominent man of letters, revealed in his Civil War writings that the conflict encouraged a dramatic shift in American thought about the relationship between the individual and society. Before the war, Emerson had generally championed “the transcendent individual,” who stood apart from institutions and organizations and sought fulfillment in an inner world of imagination and cosmic intuition. During the conflict, he began to exalt the claims of organization, government, and “civilization” over the endeavors of “the private man” to find fulfillment through “self-culture.” He even extolled military discipline and became an official visitor to West Point. In 1837, he had said of young men who aspired to political office, “Wake them up and they shall quit the false good and leap to the true, and leave governments to clerks and desks.” Now he affirmed almost the



 opposite: “Government must not be a parish clerk, a justice of the peace. It has, of necessity, in any crisis of the state, the absolute powers of a dictator.” In purging his thoughts of extreme individualism and hailing the need to accept social discipline and participate in organized, cooperative activity, Emerson epitomized the way the war affected American thought and patterns of behavior. The North won the war mainly because it had shown a greater capacity than the South to organize, innovate, and “modernize.” Its victory meant the nation as a whole would now be ready to embrace the conception of progress that the North had affirmed in its war effort—not only its advances in science and technology, but also its success in bringing together and managing large numbers of men and women for economic and social goals. The Civil War was thus a catalyst for the great transformation of American society from an individualistic society of small producers into the more highly organized and “incorporated” America of the late nineteenth century.



 CHAPTER 15

CHAPTER REVIEW

Study
 y Resources Take the Study Plan for Chapter 15 Secession and the Civil War on MyHistoryLab

TIME LINE 1860
South Carolina secedes from the Union (December) 1861 Rest of Deep South secedes: Confederacy is founded 


 (January–February); Fort Sumter is fired upon and surrenders to Confederate forces (April); Upper South secedes (April–May); South wins first battle of Bull Run (July) Grant captures Forts Henry and Donelson (February); Farragut captures New Orleans for the Union (April); McClellan leads unsuccessful campaign on the peninsula southeast of Richmond (March–July); South wins second battle of Bull Run (August); McClellan stops Lee at battle of Antietam (September); Lincoln issues preliminary Emancipation Proclamation (September); Lee defeats Union army at Fredericksburg (December)

 1863 Lincoln issues final Emancipation Proclamation (January); Lee is victorious at Chancellorsville (May); North gains major victories at Gettysburg and Vicksburg (July); Grant defeats Confederate forces at Chattanooga (November) Grant and Lee battle in northern Virginia (May– June); Atlanta falls to Sherman (September); Lincoln is reelected president, defeating McClellan (November); Sherman marches through Georgia (November–December) Congress passes Thirteenth Amendment abolishing slavery (January); Grant captures Petersburg and Richmond; Lee surrenders at Appomattox (April); Lincoln assassinated by John Wilkes Booth (April); Remaining Confederate forces surrender (April–May)





CHAPTER REVIEW
The Storm Gathers 
Fight to the Finish


 What developments and events drew the Union toward Civil War?

 How did the Union fi nally attain victory, and what role did emancipation play in it?

 Lincoln’s election prompted the secession of seven states. In South Carolina, “cooperationism” was defeated, sparking other states to follow. Republicans rejected compromise on the question of slavery in new states, and Lincoln resolved to use force should the South strike first. At Fort Sumter in 1861, it did. (p. 342)

 Lincoln was skeptical of emancipation, although he favored it morally. Later he saw the strategic benefit of opposing slavery, so he declared the freedom of slaves in unoccupied areas in the January 1863 Emancipation Proclamation. Many African Americans escaped slavery and joined the Union army, helping to turn the tide of the war. Union victories helped reelect Lincoln in 1864. (p. 352)

Adjusting to Total War
Effects of the War
ATLANTIC OCEAN

 nta A.

UNION NAVAL BLOCKADE
To restrict shipping 
 What challenges did “total war” bring for each side?

Total
 strength 24%

 Death rate

 Total war meant no cease-fire until the southern separatists were defeated. The North, with its large population, heavy industry, and agriculture, was better suited for the long conflict. The South struggled to feed itself and lacked wealth, yet put up a strong fight. Meanwhile, Lincoln maintained northern unity (p. 346) FLA.

23%
Wounded
 nonmortally

 How did the outcome of the war affect America socially and politically?

275,175
100,000*


 The Civil War changed the status of many social groups, including women, who took on new social roles after the death of male family members, and blacks, who were adjusting to free status in a white society. New national institutions, including benevolent organizations and banks, contributed to an “organizational revolution.” The federal government grew stronger than ever. (p. 360) Died from wounds

 Died from disease

110,070


94,000*


249,458


164,000*


STUDY RESOURCES



KEY TERMS AND DEFINITIONS
Cooperationists Southerners in 1860 who advocated secession by the South as a whole rather than unilateral secession by each state. p. 343 
 South had not yet been defeated, the proclamation did not immediately free anyone, but it made emancipation an explicit war aim of the North. p. 354

Crittenden Compromise Introduced by Kentucky Senator John
 Crittenden in 1861 in an attempt to prevent secession and civil war, it would have extended the Missouri Compromise line west to the Pacific. p. 344

 Copperheads Northern Democrats suspected of being indifferent or hostile to the Union cause in the Civil War. p. 356

Greenbacks
War. p. 348


 Paper currency issued by the Union during the Civil

 Sanitary Commission An association chartered by the government during the Civil War to promote health in the northern army’s camps through cleanliness, nutrition, and medical care. p. 360

Emancipation Proclamation On January 1, 1863, President Abraham
 Lincoln proclaimed that the slaves of the Confederacy were free. Since the

CRITICAL THINKING QUESTIONS 1.
Given your knowledge of society and economy in the South and public policy in the North, do you think the Union could have been preserved through means other than outright warfare? 
 2. How did Lincoln’s personal character affect the morale of the North

 3. What were the pros and cons of emancipation for someone like Lincoln who supported it personally?

 4. During the course of the war, did the American people shape the fate of government or did government shape the lives of its people?

 and the outcome of the war?

 MyHistoryLab Media Assignments Find these resources in the Media Assignments folder for Chapter 15 on MyHistoryLab The Storm Gathers ◾

◾


Watch the Video


◾


View the Map


The Civil War Part II: 1863–1865 p. 359


Read the Document William T. Sherman, the March
Through Georgia p. 360


Complete the Assignment
War p. 350


Soldiering in the Civil


Fight to the Finish
◾


 Read the Document “If it were not for my trust in Christ,” Testimony from the New York Draft Riots (1863) p. 357

Secession p. 344


Adjusting to Total War
◾


Black Union Soldiers p. 355


What Caused the Civil War? p. 342


Read the Document South Carolina Declaration of the
Causes of Secession p. 343
View the Map


View the Closer Look


Read the Document
 p. 354

The Emancipation Proclamation


Effects of the War
Watch the Video
Americans p. 361


The Meaning of the Civil War for


◾ Indicates Study Plan Media Assignment




The Agony of
Reconstruction


Contents and Learning Objectives
THE PRESIDENT VERSUS CONGRESS PG. 368

RETREAT FROM RECONSTRUCTION PG. 379

 What conflicts arose among Lincoln, Johnson, and Congress during Reconstruction?

 Why did Reconstruction end?

RECONSTRUCTING SOUTHERN SOCIETY PG. 374

 Who benefited and who suffered from the reconciliation of the North and South?

 What problems did southern society face during Reconstruction?

 Listen to the Audio File on myhistorylab

REUNION AND THE NEW SOUTH PG. 382

FEATURE ESSAY
“Forty Acres and a Mule” 
